District of Columbia statutes.
24-462

Conditions present at time of sentencing excluded.

No physical or medical condition set forth in § 24-461 which existed at the time of sentencing shall provide the basis for geriatric or medical parole under this subchapter.

May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-271, § 3, 40 DCR 792
1981 Ed., § 24-262.